Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-239.03
Sections shall not affect validity of mortgage rights of lender.

Nothing in sections 76-239.01 to 76-239.06 shall in any way affect the validity of the mortgage rights of the lender as provided for in section 76-238.01, or the lien rights of such lender.

Laws 1969, c. 612, § 3, p. 2492.